Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 12. Intestacy, Wills, and Donative Transfers.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 19, ch. 75, SLA 1996, provides, in regard to the enactment of this chapter by § 3, ch. 75, SLA 1996, as follows: “(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or in this Act,

“(1) this Act applies to the governing instruments executed by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997;

“(2) this Act applies to a proceeding in court pending on or begun on or after January 1, 1997, regardless of the time of the death of the decedent, except to the extent that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of the infeasibility of applying the procedures of this Act;

“(3) an act done before January 1, 1997, in any proceeding and an accrued right are not impaired by this Act; if a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that began to run under a statute before January 1, 1997, the provisions of the statute apply to that right on and after January 1, 1997;

“(4) a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Act, applies to governing instruments executed before January 1, 1997, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

“(b) AS

13.33.301

,

13.33.302

,

13.33.303

,

13.33.304

,

13.33.305

,

13.33.306

,

13.33.307

,

13.33.308

,

13.33.309

, and

13.33.310

, enacted by sec. 12 of this Act, apply to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before, on, or after January 1, 1997, by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997.

“(c) In this section, ‘court,’ ‘governing instrument,’ and ‘proceeding’ have the meanings given in AS

13.06.050

, amended by sec. 2 of this Act.”

Collateral references. —

Regan, Morgan, and English, Tax, Estate & Financial Planning for the Elderly (Matthew Bender).

Fiore, Friedlich, Chevat, and McInerny, Modern Estate Planning (Matthew Bender).

Freeman and Rapkin, Planning for Large Estates (Matthew Bender).

Gilfix, Morgan, and English, Tax, Estate & Financial Planning for the Elderly: Forms and Practice (Matthew Bender).

Joseph H. Murphy, Murphy’s Will Clauses: Annotations and Forms with Tax Effects (Matthew Bender).

J.K. Lasser Institute, Estate Tax Techniques (Matthew Bender).